Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.160

Delivery of proceeds and invoice to consignor or shipper.

The licensee shall deliver the net proceeds together with an invoice to the consignor or shipper within twenty-four hours after the sale or by the end of the next business day if the licensee is not on notice that any other person or persons have a valid interest in the livestock.

[ 1959 c 107 s 16.]